Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 4
Community Property Right of Survivorship

§ 15-6-401. Community property with right of survivorship in real property.

Any estate in real property held by a husband and wife as community property with right of survivorship shall, upon the death of one (1) spouse, transfer and belong to the surviving spouse. An estate in community property with right of survivorship is created by a grant, transfer or devise to a husband and wife, when expressly declared in the grant, transfer or devise to be an estate in community property with right of survivorship. An estate in community property with right of survivorship may also be created by grant or transfer from a husband and wife, when holding title as community property or otherwise, to themselves or from either husband or wife to both husband and wife when expressly declared in the grant, transfer or devise to be an estate in community property with right of survivorship.

§ 15-6-402. Termination of community property with right of survivorship in real property.

In the case of real property owned by a husband and wife as community property with right of survivorship pursuant to section 15-6-401, Idaho Code, the right of survivorship is extinguished on the recordation in the office of the recorder of the county or counties where the real property is located an affidavit entitled “affidavit terminating right of survivorship” executed by either spouse under oath which sets forth:

A stated intent by the spouse to terminate the survivorship right;

A description in the instrument by which the right of survivorship was created, including the date the instrument was recorded and the county recorder’s book and page or instrument reference number; and

The legal description of the real property affected by the affidavit.

Divorce, or annulment of the marriage of, the husband and wife, unless otherwise ordered by the court in which the divorce is granted, severs the interests of the former spouses in property held by them at the time of the divorce or annulment as community property with the right of survivorship and transforms the interests of the former spouses into tenancies in common. A severance under this section does not affect any third party interest in property acquired for value and in good faith reliance on an apparent title by survivorship in the survivor of the former spouses unless a writing declaring the severance has been noted, registered, filed or recorded in records appropriate to the kind and location of the property that a person relied upon as evidence of ownership in the ordinary course of transactions involving that property.

The recordation shall not extinguish the community interest of either spouse.

§ 15-6-403. Community property with right of survivorship in personal property.

Any estate in personal property held by a husband and wife as community property with right of survivorship shall, upon the death of one (1) spouse, transfer and belong solely to the surviving spouse as a nontestamentary disposition at death. The first deceased spouse does not have a right of disposition at death of any interest in community property with right of survivorship. An estate in community property with right of survivorship is created by a written grant, transfer or devise to a husband and wife when expressly declared in the written grant, transfer or devise to be an estate in community property with right of survivorship. An estate in community property with right of survivorship may also be created by written grant or transfer from a husband and wife, when holding title as community property or otherwise, to themselves or from either husband or wife to both husband and wife when expressly declared in the written grant, transfer or devise to be an estate in community property with right of survivorship. The grant, transfer or devise is effective upon delivery, while both husband and wife are alive, to the entity at which the personal property is held. A written grant, transfer or devise includes the making of the appropriate choice on a form from the entity at which the personal property is held.

§ 15-6-404. Termination of community property with right of survivorship in personal property.

The right of survivorship is extinguished by a document executed by either spouse that sets forth:

A stated intent by the spouse to terminate the survivorship right;

A description of the instrument by which the right of survivorship was created, including the date the instrument was executed; and

A description of the personal property affected by the document.

The right of survivorship is extinguished upon delivery, while both husband and wife are alive, of the document described in subsection (1) of this section to the entity at which the personal property is held.

Divorce or annulment of the marriage of the husband and wife, unless otherwise ordered by the court in which the divorce is granted, severs the interests of the former spouses in property held by them at the time of the divorce or annulment as community property with the right of survivorship and transforms the interests of the former spouses into tenancies in common. A severance under this section does not affect any third party interest in property acquired for value and in good faith reliance on an apparent title by survivorship in the survivor of the former spouses unless a writing declaring the severance has been noted, registered, filed or recorded in records appropriate to the kind and location of the property that a person relied upon as evidence of ownership in the ordinary course of transactions involving that property.

If both spouses are deceased and it cannot be reasonably ascertained which spouse was the first to die and which spouse survived, the right of survivorship shall be deemed terminated and the property treated as community property without the right of survivorship.

The execution of the document shall not extinguish the community interest of either spouse.